Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-240
Relocation; automatic acceptance; deadlines waived.

(1) The application of a student
who relocates in a different school district but wants to continue attending
his or her original resident school district and who has been enrolled in
his or her original resident school district for the immediately preceding
two years shall be automatically accepted, and the deadlines prescribed in
section 79-237 shall be waived.

(2) The application of an
option student who relocates in a different school district but wants to continue
attending the option school district shall be automatically accepted, and
the deadlines prescribed in section 79-237 shall be waived.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 9;

Laws 1990, LB 843, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 207, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 39;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 68;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3409;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 44;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 9.